Utah statutes.
78B-2-312.   Action on mutual account -- When considered accrued.

In an action brought to recover a balance due upon a mutual, open, and current account, where there have been reciprocal demands between the parties, the cause of action shall be considered to have accrued from the time of the last item proved in the account on either side.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

